Utah statutes.
17-30-9.   Preparation and expiration of eligible register.
(1) Upon completion of an examination the commission shall prepare an eligible
register containing the names of all persons receiving a passing grade in the
order of grades earned, beginning with the highest.
(2)  An eligible register shall expire not later than two years after the date
of the examination unless the commission, for good reason, shall extend the
time not to exceed one additional year. The promulgation of a new eligible
register shall automatically cancel all previous registers for the same class
or position.
